Massachusetts, session 194th, S604.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21N of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after section 3B, the
following section:-
Section 3C. The Secretary shall, in consultation with the department and the coastal zone
management office created in Section 4A of Chapter 21A, develop a quantified net positive
statewide carbon sequestration and storage goal for natural and working lands as defined in
Section 1. In consideration of Massachusetts’ substantial coastline, the Secretary shall study the
sequestration capacity of its salt marshes, seagrasses, and waterways in developing the
Commonwealth’s carbon sequestration goal. The sequestration goal shall be determined in
agreement with the statewide greenhouse gas emission reductions goals as established by the
Secretary.
of 1